Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2906
Advisory committee.

The commission may establish an advisory committee that is comprised of representatives from eligible entities, metropolitan planning organizations, and the private sector for the purpose of providing guidance on project prioritization, credit policy, or compliance matters.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 6.
July 18, 2026